Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB364.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 38.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Commonwealth emergency response pay" means a monetary incentive
paid to Kentucky National Guard members when the Kentucky National
Guard is called to hazardous duty assignments while on state active duty
service during a state of emergency as declared by the Governor; and
(b) "Hazardous duty" means work performed in conditions under which a
service member has an increased risk of serious injury, illness, or death.
(2) Only the Governor shall have the authority to order units and members of the
Kentucky National Guard into state active duty.
(a) The Governor may order units and individual members of the Kentucky
National Guard into state active duty for any of the following purposes:
1. Protecting lives and property;
2. Assisting in disaster relief or other humanitarian efforts;
3. Preventing or suppressing riot or civil disorder;
4. Enforcing the laws of the Commonwealth; or
5. Other similar purpose.
(b) In addition to ordering personnel and units to state active duty, the Governor
may order other members of the Kentucky National Guard to participate in or
perform duty in support of state active duty missions, notwithstanding the fact
that they are then entitled to receive federal pay and allowances pursuant to
Title 32 of the United States Code. The personnel may be ordered to perform
state active duty support missions either prior to, during, or after the time that
state active duty missions are planned or performed.
(c) Members of the National Guard who are ordered to perform duty as provided
Page 1 of 4
HB036410.100 - 983 - XXXX 3/5/2026 2:35 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 364/GA
in paragraph [subsection (1)](b) of this subsection[section] while they are
entitled to receive federal pay under Title 32 of the United States Code shall
have all of the powers, immunities, and benefits conferred by law upon
persons ordered to state active duty, except that they shall receive no
additional pay for the duty and the provisions of KRS 38.235 shall not apply
to them. The powers, immunities, and benefits conferred upon those persons
shall be in addition to, and not in place of, those powers, immunities, and
benefits provided under federal law.
(d) Any member of the National Guard may, with his or her consent, be ordered
to state active duty without pay.
(e) Any member of the Kentucky National Guard, excluding any individual
serving without pay pursuant to paragraph (d) of this subsection, shall
receive Commonwealth emergency response pay.
(f) The Department of Military Affairs shall implement reasonable personnel
pay and classification rates for Commonwealth emergency response pay at
the equivalent of two (2) days of pay for every one (1) day of qualifying duty
performed for the initial response period of seventy-two (72) hours or
longer, as determined by the adjutant general.
(3)[(2)] The Governor may direct the commanding officer of the military forces
ordered to state active duty to report to any civil officer, including, but not limited
to, judge, county judge/executive, mayor, sheriff, or head of law enforcement or
other public agency in whose jurisdiction the state active duty mission is to be
performed. The civil officer may advise the commanding officer regarding the
specific objectives to be accomplished by the military force, but the tactical
direction and disposition of the troops and the particular means to be employed to
accomplish the mission shall be left solely to the commanding officer of the
National Guard.
Page 2 of 4
HB036410.100 - 983 - XXXX 3/5/2026 2:35 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 364/GA
(4)[(3)] Troops shall not be relieved from active field service except by order of the
Governor.
(5)[(4)] National Guard officers, enlisted soldiers, and airmen who are temporarily or
permanently disabled as a direct result of an injury or disease arising out of the
performance of an act in the line of duty while on state active duty shall, at the
discretion of the Governor, remain on paid state active duty status until a competent
medical authority releases them to return to their normal activities or the Governor
deems it appropriate to relieve the individual from state active duty status.
Compensation paid to the soldier or airman by the department shall be adjusted and
maintained at the soldier's or airman's regular rate of active duty pay; however,
compensation paid by the department shall be reduced by the amount of payments
received from workers' compensation insurance, Social Security benefits, and other
federal or state-financed disability programs designed to supplement the soldier's or
airman's income. Final compensation shall not be reduced by payments for medical
care.
Section 2. KRS 38.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Kentucky National Guard" includes the Army National Guard and Air National
Guard;
(2) "Active Army National Guard and active Air National Guard" includes those
organizations, officers, and enlisted personnel, both male and female, of the
federally recognized Kentucky National Guard authorized to receive federal pay,
arms, and equipment;
(3) "Inactive Army National Guard and inactive Air National Guard" includes those
organizations, officers, and enlisted personnel, both male and female, of the
Kentucky National Guard not entitled to receive federal pay, arms, and equipment;
(4) "State active duty" is:
Page 3 of 4
HB036410.100 - 983 - XXXX 3/5/2026 2:35 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 364/GA
(a) The ordering by the Governor of personnel or units of the Kentucky National
Guard to perform any duty authorized by KRS 38.030(2)[(1)](a);
(b) Officers, warrant officers, and enlisted personnel employed under orders of
the Governor in making tours of inspection, mustering in or mustering out
troops, making surveys of military property, sitting on courts-martial,
summary courts, efficiency boards, courts of inquiry or boards of officers, or
performance of any other duty directed by the Governor or adjutant general;
(c) The participation of any unit or units of the Kentucky National Guard in
gunnery competition or other training or military exercise anywhere within or
without the United States.
(5) Words importing the masculine gender only shall extend to and be applied to
females as well as males.
Page 4 of 4
HB036410.100 - 983 - XXXX 3/5/2026 2:35 PM GA